Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2733.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 32-1901.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE32-1901.01. Definitions of unethical conduct and unprofessional conduct; permittees; licensees A. In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, for the purposes of disciplining a permittee, "unethical conduct" means the following, whether occurring in this state or elsewhere: 1. Committing a felony, whether or not involving moral turpitude, or a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude or any drug-related offense.  In either case, conviction by a court of competent jurisdiction or a plea of no contest is conclusive evidence of the commission. 2. Committing an act that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions or duties of a permittee and that demonstrates an actual or potential unfitness to hold a permit in light of the public's safety. 3. Working under the influence of alcohol or other drugs. 4. Using alcohol or other drugs to such a degree as to render the permittee unfit to perform the permittee's employment duties. 5. Violating a federal or state law or administrative rule relating to the manufacture, sale or distribution of drugs, devices, poisons, hazardous substances or precursor chemicals. 6. Violating a federal or state law or administrative rule relating to marijuana, prescription-only drugs, narcotics, dangerous drugs, controlled substances or precursor chemicals. 7. Violating state or federal reporting or recordkeeping requirements on transactions relating to precursor chemicals. 8. Intending to sell, transfer or distribute, or to offer for sale, transfer or distribution, or selling, transferring, distributing or dispensing or offering for sale, transfer or distribution an imitation controlled substance, imitation over-the-counter drug or imitation prescription-only drug as defined in section 13-3451. 9. Having the permittee's permit to manufacture, sell, distribute or dispense drugs, devices, poisons, hazardous substances or precursor chemicals denied or disciplined in another jurisdiction. 10. Committing an offense in another jurisdiction that if committed in this state would be grounds for discipline. 11. Obtaining or attempting to obtain a permit or a permit renewal by fraud, by misrepresentation or by knowingly taking advantage of the mistake of another person or an agency. 12. Wilfully making a false report or record that is required by this chapter, that is required by federal or state laws pertaining to drugs, devices, poisons, hazardous substances or precursor chemicals or that is required to pay for drugs, devices, poisons or hazardous substances or precursor chemicals or for services pertaining to such drugs or substances. 13. Knowingly filing with the board any application, renewal or other document that contains false or misleading information. 14. Providing false or misleading information or omitting material information in any communication to the board or the board's employees or agents. 15. Violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violation of, or conspiring to violate this chapter. 16. Violating a formal order, terms of probation, a consent agreement or a stipulation issued or entered into by the board or its executive director pursuant to this chapter. 17. Failing to comply with a board subpoena or failing to comply in a timely manner with a board subpoena without providing any explanation to the board for not complying with the subpoena. 18. Failing to provide the board or its employees or agents or an authorized federal or state official conducting a site investigation, inspection or audit with access to any place for which a permit has been issued or for which an application for a permit has been submitted. 19. Failing to notify the board of a change of ownership, management or pharmacist in charge. 20. Failing to promptly produce on the request of the official conducting a site investigation, inspection or audit any book, record or document. 21. Overruling or attempting to overrule a pharmacist in matters of pharmacy ethics or interpreting laws pertaining to the practice of pharmacy or the distribution of drugs or devices. 22. Distributing premiums or rebates of any kind in connection with the sale of prescription medication, other than to the prescription medication recipient. 23. Failing to maintain effective controls against the diversion of controlled substances or precursor chemicals to unauthorized persons or entities. 24. Fraudulently claiming to have performed a service. 25. Fraudulently charging a fee for a service. 26. Advertising drugs or devices, or services pertaining to drugs or devices, in a manner that is untrue or misleading in any particular, and that is known, or that by the exercise of reasonable care should be known, to be untrue or misleading. B. In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, for the purposes of disciplining a pharmacist or pharmacy intern, "unprofessional conduct" means the following, whether occurring in this state or elsewhere: 1. Using alcohol or other drugs to such a degree as to render the licensee unfit to practice the profession of pharmacy. 2. Violating any federal or state law, rule or regulation relating to the manufacture or distribution of drugs and devices or the practice of pharmacy. 3. Dispensing a different drug or brand of drug in place of the drug or brand of drug ordered or prescribed without the express permission in each case of the orderer, or in the case of a prescription order, the medical practitioner. The conduct prohibited by this paragraph does not apply to substitutions authorized pursuant to section 32-1963.01. 4. Obtaining or attempting to obtain a license to practice pharmacy or a license renewal by fraud, by misrepresentation or by knowingly taking advantage of the mistake of another person or an agency. 5. Having the licensee's license to practice pharmacy denied or disciplined in another jurisdiction. 6. Claiming professional superiority in compounding or dispensing prescription orders. 7. Failing to comply with the mandatory continuing professional pharmacy education requirements of sections 32-1936 and 32-1937 and rules adopted by the board. 8. Committing a felony, whether or not involving moral turpitude, or a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude or any drug-related offense.  In either case, conviction by a court of competent jurisdiction or a plea of no contest is conclusive evidence of the commission. 9. Working under the influence of alcohol or other drugs. 10. Violating a federal or state law or administrative rule relating to marijuana, prescription-only drugs, narcotics, dangerous drugs, controlled substances or precursor chemicals when determined by the board or by conviction in a federal or state court. 11. Knowingly dispensing a drug without a valid prescription order as required pursuant to section 32-1968, subsection A. 12. Knowingly dispensing a drug on a prescription order that was issued in the course of the conduct of business of dispensing drugs pursuant to diagnosis by mail or the internet, unless the order was any of the following: (a) Made by a physician who provides temporary patient supervision on behalf of the patient's regular treating licensed health care professional or provides a consultation requested by the patient's regular treating licensed health care professional. (b) Made in an emergency medical situation as defined in section 41-1831. (c) Written to prepare a patient for a medical examination. (d) Written or the prescription medications were issued for use by a county or tribal public health department for immunization programs or emergency treatment or in response to an infectious disease investigation, a public health emergency, an infectious disease outbreak or an act of bioterrorism. For the purposes of this subdivision, "bioterrorism" has the same meaning prescribed in section 36-781. (e) Written or antimicrobials were dispensed by the prescribing or dispensing physician to a contact as defined in section 36-661 who is believed to have had significant exposure risk as defined in section 36-661 with another person who has been diagnosed with a communicable disease as defined in section 36-661. (f) Written or the prescription medications were issued for administering immunizations or vaccines listed in the United States centers for disease control and prevention's recommended immunization schedule to a household member of a patient. (g) For epinephrine delivery systems that are written or dispensed for a school district or charter school and that are to be stocked for emergency use pursuant to section 15-157 or for an authorized entity to be stocked pursuant to section 36-2226.01. (h) For glucagon that is written or dispensed for a school district or charter school and that is to be stocked for emergency use pursuant to section 15-344.01. (i) Written by a licensee through a telehealth program that is covered by the policies and procedures adopted by the administrator of a hospital or outpatient treatment center. (j) Written pursuant to a physical or mental health status examination that was conducted through telehealth as defined in section 36-3601 and consistent with federal law. (k) For naloxone hydrochloride or any other opioid antagonist approved by the United States food and drug administration and written or dispensed for use pursuant to section 36-2228 or 36-2266. 13. Failing to report in writing to the board any evidence that a pharmacist or pharmacy intern is or may be professionally incompetent, is or may be guilty of unprofessional conduct or is or may be mentally or physically unable to safely engage in the practice of pharmacy. 14. Failing to report in writing to the board any evidence that a pharmacy technician or pharmacy technician trainee is or may be professionally incompetent, is or may be guilty of unprofessional conduct or is or may be mentally or physically unable to safely engage in the permissible activities of a pharmacy technician or pharmacy technician trainee. 15. Failing to report in writing to the board any evidence that a permittee or a permittee's employee is or may be guilty of unethical conduct or is or may be violating this chapter or a rule adopted under this chapter. 16. Committing an offense in another jurisdiction that if committed in this state would be grounds for discipline. 17. Knowingly filing with the board any application, renewal or other document that contains false or misleading information. 18. Providing false or misleading information or omitting material information in any communication to the board or the board's employees or agents. 19. Violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting in the violation of, or conspiring to violate this chapter. 20. Violating a formal order, terms of probation, a consent agreement or a stipulation issued or entered into by the board or its executive director pursuant to this chapter. 21. Failing to comply with a board subpoena or failing to comply in a timely manner with a board subpoena without providing any explanation to the board for not complying with the subpoena. 22. Refusing without just cause to allow authorized agents of the board to examine documents that are required to be kept pursuant to this chapter or title 36. 23. Participating in an arrangement or agreement to allow a prescription order or a prescription medication to be left at, picked up from, accepted by or delivered to a place that is not licensed as a pharmacy. This paragraph does not prohibit a pharmacist or a pharmacy from using an employee or a common carrier to pick up prescription orders at or deliver, unless prohibited by federal law, prescription medications to the office or home of a medical practitioner practitioner's home or office, the patient's residence, of a patient or a patient's a hospital, long-term care facility or workplace or another designated physical address provided by the patient where the patient or the patient's designated agent is available to receive a delivery. 24. Paying rebates or entering into an agreement for paying rebates to a medical practitioner or any other person in the health care field. 25. Providing or causing to be provided to a medical practitioner prescription order blanks or forms bearing the pharmacist's or pharmacy's name, address or other means of identification. 26. Fraudulently claiming to have performed a professional service. 27. Fraudulently charging a fee for a professional service. 28. Failing to report a change of the licensee's home address, contact information, employer or employer's address as required by section 32-1926. 29. Failing to report a change in the licensee's residency status as required by section 32-1926.01. 30. Failing to maintain effective controls against the diversion of controlled substances or precursor chemicals to unauthorized persons or entities. C. In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, for the purposes of disciplining a pharmacy technician or pharmacy technician trainee, "unprofessional conduct" means the following, whether occurring in this state or elsewhere: 1. Using alcohol or other drugs to such a degree as to render the licensee or registrant unfit to perform the licensee's or registrant's employment duties. 2. Violating a federal or state law or administrative rule relating to the manufacture or distribution of drugs or devices. 3. Obtaining or attempting to obtain a pharmacy technician license or license renewal or pharmacy technician trainee registration by fraud, by misrepresentation or by knowingly taking advantage of the mistake of another person or an agency. 4. Having the licensee's license to practice as a pharmacy technician denied or disciplined in another jurisdiction. 5. Failing to comply with the mandatory continuing professional education requirements of section 32-1925, subsection H and rules adopted by the board. 6. Committing a felony, whether or not involving moral turpitude, or a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude or any drug-related offense. In either case, conviction by a court of competent jurisdiction or a plea of no contest is conclusive evidence of the commission. 7. Working under the influence of alcohol or other drugs. 8. Violating a federal or state law or administrative rule relating to marijuana, prescription-only drugs, narcotics, dangerous drugs, controlled substances or precursor chemicals when determined by the board or by conviction in a federal or state court. 9. Failing to report in writing to the board any evidence that a pharmacist or pharmacy intern is or may be professionally incompetent, is or may be guilty of unprofessional conduct or is or may be mentally or physically unable to safely engage in the practice of pharmacy. 10. Failing to report in writing to the board any evidence that a pharmacy technician or pharmacy technician trainee is or may be professionally incompetent, is or may be guilty of unprofessional conduct or is or may be mentally or physically unable to safely engage in the permissible activities of a pharmacy technician or pharmacy technician trainee. 11. Failing to report in writing to the board any evidence that a permittee or a permittee's employee is or may be guilty of unethical conduct or is or may be violating this chapter or a rule adopted under this chapter. 12. Committing an offense in another jurisdiction that if committed in this state would be grounds for discipline. 13. Knowingly filing with the board any application, renewal or other document that contains false or misleading information. 14. Providing false or misleading information or omitting material information in any communication to the board or the board's employees or agents. 15. Violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting in the violation of, or conspiring to violate this chapter. 16. Violating a formal order, terms of probation, a consent agreement or a stipulation issued or entered into by the board or its executive director pursuant to this chapter. 17. Failing to comply with a board subpoena or failing to comply in a timely manner with a board subpoena without providing any explanation to the board for not complying with the subpoena. 18. Failing to report a change of the licensee's or registrant's home address, contact information, employer or employer's address as required by section 32-1926. 19. Failing to report a change in the licensee's or registrant's residency status as required by section 32-1926.01. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 32-1925, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE32-1925. Renewal of license of pharmacists, interns and pharmacy technicians; fees; expiration dates; penalty for failure to renew; continuing education A. Except for interns and pharmacy technician trainees, the board shall assign all persons who are licensed under this chapter to one of two license renewal groups. Except as provided in section 32-4301, a holder of a license certificate designated in the licensing database as even by way of verbiage or numerical value shall renew it biennially on or before November 1 of the even-numbered year, two years after the last renewal date. Except as provided in section 32-4301, a holder of a license certificate designated in the licensing database as odd by way of verbiage or numerical value shall renew it biennially on or before November 1 of the odd-numbered year, two years after the last renewal date.  Failure to renew and pay all required fees on or before November 1 of the year in which the renewal is due suspends the license. The board shall vacate a suspension when the licensee pays all past due fees and reinstatement penalties. Reinstatement penalties shall not exceed $350. The board may waive collection of a fee or reinstatement penalty due after suspension under conditions established by a majority of the board. B. A person shall not apply for license renewal more than sixty days before the expiration date of the license. C. A person who is licensed as a pharmacist or a pharmacy technician and who has not renewed the license for five consecutive years shall furnish to the board satisfactory proof of fitness to be licensed as a pharmacist or a pharmacy technician.  A person whose license has lapsed for two or more renewal cycles shall pay the fees for the two most recent renewal cycles and the penalties before being reinstated. D. Biennial renewal fees for licensure shall be not more than: 1. For a pharmacist, $250. 2. For a pharmacy technician, $100. 3. For a duplicate renewal license, $25. E. Fees that are designated to be not more than a maximum amount shall be set by the board for the following two fiscal years beginning November 1. The board shall establish fees that are approximately proportionate to the maximum fee allowed to cover the board's anticipated expenditures for the following two fiscal years. Variation in a fee is not effective except at the expiration date of a license. F. The board shall not renew a license for a pharmacist unless the pharmacist has complied with the mandatory continuing professional pharmacy education requirements of sections 32-1936 and 32-1937. A pharmacist may complete the mandatory continuing professional pharmacy education requirements after submitting a renewal application and paying the applicable renewal fee, but the continuing education requirements must be completed before the pharmacist's license expires for that renewal cycle. The board shall update and maintain the renewal application and renewal procedures to be consistent with this subsection. G. The board shall prescribe intern licensure renewal fees that do not exceed $75. The license of an intern who does not receive specific board approval to renew the intern license or who receives board approval to renew but who does not renew and pay all required fees before the license expiration date is suspended after the license expiration date. The board shall vacate a suspension if the licensee pays all past due fees and penalties. Penalties shall not exceed $350. The board may waive collection of a fee or penalty due after suspension under conditions established by the board. H. The board shall not renew a license for a pharmacy technician unless that person has a current board-approved license and has complied with board-approved mandatory continuing professional education requirements.  A pharmacy technician may complete the mandatory continuing professional pharmacy education requirements after submitting a renewal application and paying the applicable renewal fee, but the continuing education requirements must be completed before the pharmacy technician's license expires for that renewal cycle. The board shall update and maintain the renewal application and renewal procedures to be consistent with this subsection. If a pharmacy technician prepares, compounds or dispenses prescription medications at a remote dispensing site pharmacy, the pharmacy technician shall complete, in addition to any other board-approved mandatory continuing professional education requirements, a two-hour continuing education program on remote dispensing site pharmacy practices provided by an approved provider. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Title 32, chapter 18, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 32-1930.01, to read: START_STATUTE32-1930.01. Change of ownership; continued operations; termination A. Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter to the contrary, if a business that holds a valid permit issued by the board undergoes a change of ownership, the business may continue to operate under the existing permit during the period in which the new owner's permit application is under review if all of the following conditions are met: 1. The new owner notifies the board within seven calendar days after the effective date of the change in ownership and Submits a permit application within thirty calendar days after the effective date of the change of ownership. 2. The business remains in compliance with all statutes and rules applicable to the permit type. 3. The existing permit has not expired, been suspended or been revoked. 4. The new owner attests to assume responsibility for compliance with all regulatory requirements during the transition period. B. The board may deny continued operation of a business under subsection A of this section if the board determines any of the following: 1. The change in ownership presents a risk to public health or safety. 2. The new owner has failed to meet any requirement of subsection A of this section. 3. The board has credible evidence of fraud, diversion or other conduct that would constitute grounds for permit denial. C. Continued operation under subsection A of this section automatically terminates on the earliest of either: 1. The date the board issues the new permit. 2. The date the board denies the permit application. D. A business operating pursuant to this section is subject to all inspections, reporting requirements and enforcement actions to the same extent as a permitted entity. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Section 32-1965, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE32-1965. Prohibited acts Committing or causing any of the following acts or the causing of any thereof, in addition to any others so other act specified in this chapter, are is prohibited: 1. The manufacture, sale Manufacturing, selling, holding or offering for sale of any drug, device, poison,  or hazardous substance that is adulterated or misbranded. 2. The adulteration Adultering or misbranding of any drug, device, poison,  or hazardous substance. 3. The alteration, mutilation, destruction, obliteration, Altering, mutilating, destroying, obliterating or removal of removing the whole or any part of the labeling of, or the doing of any other act with respect to, a drug, device, poison,  or hazardous substance, if such an act is done while such the article is held for sale and results in such the article being adulterated or misbranded. 4. The manufacture, sale manufacturing, selling, holding or offering for sale of a counterfeit drug or forging, counterfeiting, simulating,  or falsely representing or without proper authority using any mark, stamp, tag, label,  or other identification device authorized or required by rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter,  or of the federal act. 5. The Using, on the labeling of any drug or device,  or in any advertisement,  relating to such a drug or device, of any representation or suggestion that such the drug or device complies with the provisions of this chapter. 6. In the case of a prescription-only drug or a controlled substance that requires a prescription order by state or federal law, the failure of the manufacturer, packer,  or distributor to transmit, to any medical practitioner who makes a written request for information about such a drug, true and correct copies of all printed matter included in any package in which that drug is distributed or other printed matter approved under the federal act. 7. Engaging in the practice of pharmacy without first having a current license in good standing issued by the board. 8. Making or offering to make a forged, counterfeit, altered or photocopied prescription or drug order for the purpose of obtaining prescription-only drugs or controlled substance drugs substances. 9. Wholesaling or distributing a prescription drug or prescription device, a controlled substance, a nonprescription drug, a regulated chemical as defined in section 13-3401, medical gas or durable medical equipment without a valid board-issued permit. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 19, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.